Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0864.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of state
police for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the
following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 7.0
Full-time equated classified positions 3,568.0
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 979,683,600
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 29,521,800
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATIONS $ 950,161,800
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 100,351,800
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 5,088,800
Total private revenues 35,000
Total other state restricted revenues 200,908,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 643,778,200
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 7.0
Full-time equated classified positions 139.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 7.0 $ 1,473,900
Department services--FTEs 39.0 10,679,700
Departmentwide 49,120,900
Executive direction--FTEs 61.0 11,225,500
Mobile office and system support--FTEs 39.0 7,522,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 80,022,500
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of transportation, state
trunkline fund 86,700
IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming
fees 434,700
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


IDG, training academy charges 229,100
IDT - auto theft funds 1,500
IDT - truck safety fund 75,400
Federal revenues:
DHS 32,400
DOJ 12,800
DOJ, interest bearing 9,900
DOT 301,400
Federal indirect funds 2,789,000
Special revenue funds:
Local - AFIS fees 100
Local - LEIN fees 800
Local - reimbursed services 300
Local - school bus revenue 8,900
Auto theft prevention fund 26,300
Criminal justice information center service
fees 2,900,600
Drunk driving prevention and training fund 3,200
Forensic science reimbursement fees 52,300
Hazardous materials training center fees 46,800
Highway safety fund 304,200
Marihuana regulatory fund 271,400
Michigan justice training fund 3,700
Michigan merit award trust fund 16,600
Motor carrier fees 421,700
Narcotics-related forfeiture revenue 400
Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 23,400
Precision driving track fees 800
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


Reimbursed services 300
Sex offenders registration fund 800
State forensic laboratory fund 90,400
State police administrator and coordinator 911
fund 25,800
State police service fees 400
State services fee fund 261,800
Tobacco tax revenue 117,500
Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 639,200
Truck driver safety fund 1,800
Vehicle sales proceeds 650,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 70,180,100
Sec. 103. LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 607.0
Biometrics and identification--FTEs 60.0 $ 13,055,900
Criminal justice information center--FTEs 154.0 34,884,500
Forensic science--FTEs 281.0 50,114,200
Grants and community services--FTEs 31.0 22,889,800
Office of school safety--FTEs 6.0 1,410,900
State 9-1-1 administration--FTEs 5.0 1,165,700
Training operations--FTEs 70.0 16,447,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 139,968,300
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of state 428,700
IDG from department of transportation, state
trunkline fund 791,100
IDG, training academy charges 3,081,200
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


IDT, Michigan Justice training fund 1,100,000
Federal revenues:
DOJ 14,344,300
DOJ, interest bearing 4,029,500
DOT 1,975,400
Special revenue funds:
Local - SRMS fees 919,200
Private donations 20,000
Auto theft prevention fund 9,018,200
Criminal justice information center service
fees 30,490,700
Drunk driving prevention and training fund 676,000
Forensic science reimbursement fees 1,033,300
Michigan set aside fund 600,000
Motor carrier fees 148,500
Precision driving track fees 346,100
Sex offenders registration fund 697,800
State forensic laboratory fund 767,600
State police administrator and coordinator 911
fund 1,165,700
State services fee fund 8,459,400
Student safety fund 250,000
Traffic crash revenue 592,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 59,033,200
Sec. 104. MICHIGAN COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT
STANDARDS
Full-time equated classified positions 27.0
In-service training--FTEs 7.0 13,280,300
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


Justice training grants--FTEs 3.0 $ 10,000,000
Public safety officers benefit fund--FTE 1.0 303,300
Standards and training--FTEs 16.0 4,115,000
Training only to local units 855,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,553,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOJ 280,900
Special revenue funds:
Law enforcement officers training fund 25,300
Marihuana regulatory fund 3,440,400
Michigan justice training fund 10,000,000
Private security licensing fees 5,000
Retired law enforcement officer safety fund 25,000
Secondary road patrol and training fund 855,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 13,922,000
Sec. 105. FIELD SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 2,153.0
Investigative services--FTEs 148.5 $ 44,212,400
Post operations--FTEs 2,004.5 465,457,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 509,670,000
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming
fees 6,890,500
IDT - Auto theft funds 1,159,800
Federal revenues:
DOJ 4,678,600
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


DOT 2,125,800
Federal forfeiture revenues 544,100
Federal investigations - reimbursed services 4,031,800
Special revenue funds:
Local - reimbursed services 1,259,000
Bottle bill enforcement fund 787,600
Highway safety fund 10,416,900
Marihuana regulation fund 3,447,400
Marihuana regulatory fund 2,674,500
Michigan merit award trust fund 872,900
Narcotics-related forfeiture revenue 1,554,100
Nonnarcotic forfeiture revenue 50,600
State police service fees 6,285,200
State services fee fund 1,028,600
Tobacco tax revenue 5,656,300
Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 35,918,400
Trooper school recruitment fund 5,069,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 415,218,200
Sec. 106. SPECIALIZED SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 642.0
Commercial vehicle enforcement--FTEs 211.0 $ 40,920,600
Emergency management and homeland security--
FTEs 64.0 17,605,900
Hazardous materials programs--FTEs 25.0 23,717,300
Highway safety planning--FTEs 25.0 22,288,500
Intelligence operations--FTEs 228.0 36,975,000
Secondary road patrol program--FTE 1.0 18,003,200
Special operations--FTEs 88.0 21,900,900
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 181,411,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of transportation, state
trunkline fund 12,805,700
IDG from department of treasury, public safety
answer point training 911 fund 100,000
IDT - truck safety fund 2,100,000
Federal revenues:
DHS 32,488,500
DOT 32,507,400
Special revenue funds:
Local - school bus revenue 1,948,800
Private donations 15,000
Bottle bill enforcement fund 230,000
Criminal justice information center service
fees 329,600
Hazardous materials training center fees 749,700
Marihuana regulation fund 257,700
Marihuana regulatory fund 390,200
Motor carrier fees 9,266,900
Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 2,467,400
Reimbursed services 1,893,000
Rental of departmental aircraft 52,400
Secondary road patrol and training fund 18,003,200
State police dispatch operator 911 fund 681,900
Truck driver safety fund 4,978,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 60,145,700
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


Sec. 107. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 30,057,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 30,057,800
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of transportation, state
trunkline fund 124,200
IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming
fees 80,000
IDG, training academy charges 11,500
IDT - auto theft funds 4,300
IDT - truck safety fund 17,400
Federal revenues:
DHS 50,000
DOJ 100,000
DOT 50,000
Special revenue funds:
Local - AFIS fees 80,000
Local - LEIN fees 851,300
Local - school bus revenue 20,400
Auto theft prevention fund 6,200
Criminal justice information center service
fees 11,500,000
Drunk driving prevention and training fund 3,600
Forensic science reimbursement fees 76,500
Highway safety fund 92,400
Marihuana regulatory fund 773,700
Michigan merit award trust fund 3,400
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


Motor carrier fees 170,500
Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 12,800
Sex offenders registration fund 228,400
State forensic laboratory fund 50,000
State services fee fund 84,400
Tobacco tax revenue 21,400
Traffic crash revenue 246,900
Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 119,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 15,279,000
Sec. 108. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Disaster and emergency contingency fund $ 10,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for fiscal year ending September 30,
2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$844,686,200.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $40,441,500.00.
The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from
which spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
In-service training $ 14,586,000
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


Justice training grants 10,000,000
Secondary road patrol program 15,000,000
Training only to local units 855,500
TOTAL $ 40,441,500
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "AFIS" means the automated fingerprint identification
system.
(b) "CJIS" means Criminal Justice Information Systems.
(c) "Department" means the department of state police.
(d) "DHS" means the United States Department of Homeland
Security.
(e) "Director" means the director of the department.
(f) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.
(g) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice.
(h) "DOT" means the United States Department of
Transportation.
(i) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified
service of this state.
(j) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(k) "LEIN" means the law enforcement information network.
(l) "MCOLES" means the Michigan commission on law enforcement
standards created in section 3 of the Michigan commission on law
enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.603.
(m) "SIGMA" means the statewide integrated governmental
management application.
(n) "SRMS" means the state records management system.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


(o) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on state police, the senate and house
fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state
budget office.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years, posted by
fiscal year, in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other
required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
of-state travel expenses not later than January 1 of each year. The
report must list all travel by classified and unclassified
employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was
funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the
department's or agency's budget. The department or agency shall
submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the
senate and house appropriations committees. The report must include
all of the following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel
occurrence and the proportion funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific
sources of state restricted, federal, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program area. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department
of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable
website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following for the department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure that geographically
disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform
contracts to provide services or supplies, or both. The director
shall strongly encourage firms with which the department contracts
to subcontract with geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises for services or supplies, or both. As used in this
section, "geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means
that term as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-01.
Sec. 215. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to civil service rules and
regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80.0 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to
the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 218. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 220. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


the report to the standard report recipients, the senate and house
appropriations committees, and the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 223. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department shall submit an
annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 224. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $126,492,400.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $99,258,100.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at
$27,234,300.00.
Sec. 225. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 226. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 227. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 228. The department shall submit a biannual report on the
performance metrics cited or information required to be reported in
this part, reasons for nonachievement of metric targets, and
proposed corrective actions.
Sec. 229. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that the
department shall take all steps necessary to protect the data and
privacy of citizens who are not the focus of a departmental
investigation and to protect personal information from unauthorized
access or misuse. The protection required under this subsection
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) Requiring vendors or service providers to protect data
shared with them.
(b) Ensuring that when personal data is collected, but no
longer utilized by the department, that reasonable steps be taken
to securely destroy records containing personal information when it
is to be discarded so that the information is rendered
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


indecipherable and is not sold for marketing or other purposes.
(2) The department shall provide written notification to any
data subject whose sensitive personal information is accessed or
acquired by an unauthorized person.
Sec. 230. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the
house and senate shall provide to the state budget office a jointly
agreed-upon list of legislatively directed spending items funded in
part 1 as defined in section 364 of the management and budget act,
1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364. The list must include all information and
documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in
accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year, and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 231. (1) The department may accept monetary and
nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants
from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part,
a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or
use the gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants
accepted under this subsection for the purposes designated by the
private or public source, if the purpose is specified.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


(2) Revenue collected by the department under this section
that is unexpended and unencumbered must not lapse to the general
fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year.
(3) Private revenues received under this section that exceed
the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received
and expended by the department for the purposes for which the funds
are received.
(4) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the
state budget office under this section, the department shall notify
the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police
and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the
approval. The notification must include the amount and funding
source of the additional authorization, the date of the approval,
and the projected use of the funds to be expended.
Sec. 232. (1) Federal revenues authorized by and available
from the federal government in excess of the appropriations in part
1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the
department for purposes authorized under state law and subject to
federal requirements. The total amount of federal revenues that may
be received and expended under this section and section 704(3) must
not exceed $750,000,000.00.
(2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients
before expending federal revenues received and appropriated under
subsection (1).
(3) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the
state budget office under this section, the department shall notify
the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police
and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the
approval. The notification must include the amount and funding
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval,
and the projected use of the funds to be expended.
Sec. 233. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026,
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial closeout period.
Sec. 234. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of Public Law 117-2 must be followed for state fiscal
recovery funds reallocated and reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 235. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.

DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Sec. 301. The department shall notify the standard report
recipients when it recommends to close or consolidate any state
police post. The notification must include a local and state impact
study of the proposed post closure or consolidation.
Sec. 302. If the department presents a plan to the state
employer to privatize, the department shall submit a complete
project plan to the standard report recipients. The plan must
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


include the criteria under which the privatization initiative will
be evaluated. The evaluation must be completed and submitted to the
standard report recipients within 30 months.
Sec. 303. (1) When the department provides contractual
services to a local unit of government, the department shall be
reimbursed for all costs incurred in providing the services.
(2) The department shall define service cost models for those
services requiring reimbursement.
(3) Contractual services provided to an entity other than a
local unit of government may be provided by department personnel,
but only on an overtime basis outside the normal work schedule of
the personnel. All costs incurred in providing the services are
eligible for reimbursement.
(4) This section does not apply to services provided to state
agencies.
(5) Revenues received for contractual or reimbursed services
in excess of the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may
be received and expended by the department for the purposes for
which the funds are received.
(6) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the
state budget office under this section, the department shall notify
the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police
and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the
approval. The notification must include the amount and funding
source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval,
and the projected use of the funds to be expended.
Sec. 304. The department may establish and collect fees for
publications, videos, conferences, workshops, and related
materials. Fees collected under this section must be used to offset
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


expenditures for costs of the publications, videos, workshops,
conferences, and related materials. The department shall not
collect fees under this section that exceed the cost of the
expenditures.
Sec. 305. A law enforcement officer funded under part 1 shall
not be required to issue a predetermined or specified number of
citations for violations of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300,
MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or of a local ordinance that substantially
corresponds to the provisions of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA
300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, including parking or standing
violations. A law enforcement officer's performance evaluation
system must not require a predetermined or specified number of
citations to be issued.
Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may purchase real property and shall notify the standard
report recipients within 10 days of the purchase.

LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES
Sec. 401. (1) The department shall develop and deliver
professional, innovative, and quality training that supports the
enforcement and public safety efforts of the criminal justice
community.
(2) The department shall provide performance data, as provided
under section 228, for days of training being conducted by the
academy.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for training
operations, the department may provide or obtain the following
training:
(a) Training that directly relates to the individual's job
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


description and role within the department.
(b) Professional development training.
(c) Training that provides the individual with the ability to
seek expanded opportunities within the department.
(d) Advanced education training.
(4) Not later than January 1, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and
house appropriations committees that includes the following
information about the funds appropriated in part 1 for training
operations:
(a) The training courses that the department's employees
completed.
(b) If a training course is developed by the department, a
description of that course's curriculum and its purpose.
(c) The number of the department's employees who have received
and completed training pursuant to this section.
(5) The department shall distribute and review course
evaluations to ensure that quality training is provided.
Sec. 402. (1) In accordance with applicable state and federal
laws and regulations, the department shall maintain and ensure
compliance with CJIS databases and applications in the support of
public safety and law enforcement communities.
(2) The department shall improve the accuracy, timeliness, and
completeness of criminal history information by conducting a
minimum of 30 outreach activities targeted to criminal justice
agencies. The department shall report the number of these outreach
activities conducted, as provided under section 228.
(3) The department shall provide for the compilation of crime
statistics consistent with the uniform crime reporting (UCR)
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


program and the national incident-based report system (NIBRS).
(4) The department shall provide for the compilation and
evaluation of traffic crash reports and the maintenance of the
state accident data collection system.
(5) The department shall make individual traffic crash reports
available for a fee of $15.00 per incident. The department may also
sell an extract of electronic traffic crash data for a fee of $0.25
per incident, provided that the name, address, and any other
personal identifying information have been excluded.
(6) By March 1, the department shall submit a report to the
standard report recipients detailing the number of traffic crash
reports provided, the amount of revenue collected, and all
expenditures incurred for activities under subsection (5) in the
preceding fiscal year. The report must include an analysis of
whether revenue from department activities under subsection (5) is
sufficient to offset all costs incurred for those activities and
must provide information regarding any deficit or surplus of
revenue.
(7) In accordance with applicable state and federal laws and
regulations, the department shall provide for the maintenance and
dissemination of criminal history records and juvenile records,
including to the extent necessary to exchange criminal history
records information with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and
other states through the interstate identification index, the
National Crime Information Center, and other federal CJIS databases
and indices.
(8) The department shall, in accordance with applicable state
and federal laws, provide for the maintenance of records, including
criminal history records regarding firearms licensure, as provided
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435.
(9) The department shall provide information on the number of
background checks processed through the internet criminal history
access tool (ICHAT), as provided in section 228.
(10) The following unexpended and unencumbered revenues
deposited into the criminal justice information center service fees
must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward
into the subsequent fiscal year:
(a) Fees for fingerprinting and criminal record checks and
name-based criminal record checks under 1935 PA 120, MCL 28.271 to
28.274.
(b) Fees for application and licensing for initial and renewal
concealed pistol licenses under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435.
(c) Fees for searching, copying, and providing public records
under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to
15.246.
(d) Revenue from other sources, including, but not limited to,
investment and interest earnings.
(11) Unexpended and unencumbered revenue generated by state
records management system fees must not lapse to the general fund,
but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 403. (1) The department shall provide forensic testing
and analysis/profiling of DNA evidence to aid in law enforcement
investigations in this state.
(2) The department shall ensure its ability to maintain
accreditation by a federally designated accrediting agency, as
provided under 34 USC 12592.
(3) The department shall provide forensic science services
with an average turnaround time of 55 days, assuming an annual
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


caseload volume commensurate with the average annual caseload
received by the forensic science division during the preceding 5
fiscal years, and shall work to achieve a goal of a 30-day average
turnaround time across all forensic science disciplines.
(4) The department shall provide the following data as
provided in section 228:
(a) The average turnaround time for processing forensic
evidence across all disciplines.
(b) Forensic laboratory staffing levels, including scientists
in training, and vacancies.
(c) The number of backlogged cases in each discipline.
Sec. 404. (1) The biometrics and identification division shall
maintain and manage the automated biometric identification system,
statewide network of agency photographs, and combined offender DNA
index system biometric databases.
(2) The department shall provide data on the number of 10-
print and palm-print submissions to the database, as provided in
section 228.
(3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to have a 28-day average wait time for scheduling a
polygraph examination, assuming an annual caseload received
commensurate with the average annual caseload received during the
preceding 5 fiscal years, with a goal of achieving a 15-day average
wait time.
(4) If changes are made to the department's protocol for
retaining and purging DNA analysis samples and records, the
department shall post a copy of the protocol changes on the
department's website.
Sec. 405. Not later than December 1, the department shall
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes,
but is not limited to, all of the following information:
(a) Sexual assault kit analysis backlog at the beginning of
the previous fiscal year.
(b) The number of sexual assault kits collected or submitted
for analysis during the previous fiscal year.
(c) The number of sexual assault kits analyzed and the number
of associated DNA profiles created and uploaded during the previous
fiscal year.
(d) Sexual assault kit analysis backlog at the end of the
previous fiscal year.
(e) The average turnaround time to analyze sexual assault kits
and to create and upload associated DNA profiles for the previous
fiscal year.
Sec. 406. The department shall provide administrative support
for the following grant and community service programs:
(a) The operations of the automobile theft prevention
authority.
(b) Administration of the Edward Byrne memorial justice
assistance program and other grant programs, including the
department's community policing efforts.
(c) Administration of the office of school safety.
(d) Administration and outreach of the OK2SAY program.
Sec. 407. Not later than March 30, the office of school safety
shall provide a school safety report to the legislature and the
senate and house fiscal agencies that must include reports of all
of the following:
(a) The incidents of school violence or threats reported to
the state police by local law enforcement or local school
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


districts, or received through the Michigan incident crime report
(MICR).
(b) OK2SAY-based incidences and activities.
(c) Based upon an evaluation of school safety incidents,
recommendations on best practices and other safety measures to
ensure school safety in this state.
Sec. 408. (1) The department shall make an organized,
strategic effort to recruit, onboard, train, and outfit trooper
school candidates and other new employees using the funds
appropriated in part 1.
(2) The department shall submit a report to the standard
report recipients within 60 days of the conclusion of any trooper,
motor carrier, or state properties security recruit school. The
report must include all of the following:
(a) The number of veterans and the number of MCOLES-certified
police officers who were admitted to and the number who graduated
from the recruit school.
(b) The total number of recruits who were admitted to the
recruit school, the number of recruits who graduated from the
recruit school, and the location at which each of these recruits is
assigned.
(3) The department may use the funds appropriated in part 1
that represent attrition savings to offset the cost of recruiting
efforts described under subsection (1).
(4) The unexpended and unencumbered general fund/general
purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for training operations must
not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year but
must be deposited into the trooper recruit school fund created
under section 819b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


257.819b.
Sec. 409. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall, in collaboration with the department of civil
rights and MCOLES, provide the following training to local police
departments or officers free of charge:
(a) Diversity and cultural awareness and competency.
(b) Conflict management.
(c) Use of force on vulnerable individuals, including
children, individuals with disabilities, individuals with unmet
mental health needs, individuals under the influence of substances,
and pregnant individuals.
(d) Mental health and wellness for law enforcement officers.
(2) The training provided under subsection (1) may be offered
online in order to facilitate easy access and may be given by
department staff, contractors, or external vendors.
(3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a report
to the standard report recipients on the number of officers, by
police department, that received training under this section.
Sec. 410. The department, in collaboration with the department
of health and human services and the department of education, shall
advise on initiatives in schools and other educational
organizations that include, but are not limited to, training for
educators, teachers, and other personnel in school settings for all
of the following:
(a) Utilization of trauma-informed practices.
(b) Age-appropriate education and information on human
trafficking.
(c) Age-appropriate education and information on sexual abuse
prevention.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


Sec. 411. Based on the availability of federal funding and
demonstrated need, as indicated by applications submitted to the
state court administrative office, the department shall provide
$1,500,000.00 in Byrne justice assistance grant program funding to
the judiciary by interdepartmental grant.

MICHIGAN COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS
Sec. 501. (1) MCOLES shall establish standards for the
selection, employment, training, education, licensing, and
licensure revocation of all law enforcement officers and provide
the basic law enforcement training curriculum for law enforcement
training academy programs statewide.
(2) MCOLES shall maintain staffing and resources necessary to
update law enforcement standards within 120 days of the enactment
date of any new public acts that affect MCOLES.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1, MCOLES, by March 1,
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
includes a summary of MCOLES activities during the prior calendar
year. The report required under this subsection must include, but
is not limited to, both of the following:
(a) An account of the distribution of training funds
administered by MCOLES.
(b) A list of recipients that received training funds under
subdivision (a) and the amount received by each recipient and for
what purpose it was used.
Sec. 502. The general fund/general purpose funds appropriated
in part 1 for public safety officers benefit fund must be deposited
into the public safety officers benefit fund created in section 3
of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.633.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


All funds in the public safety officers benefit fund are
appropriated and available for expenditure in accordance with
section 3 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46,
MCL 28.633.
Sec. 503. Funds appropriated in part 1 for in-service training
must be deposited into the law enforcement officers training fund
created in section 11(7) of the Michigan commission on law
enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.611. All funds in
the law enforcement officers training fund are appropriated and
available for expenditure to support the implementation of required
annual in-service training standards for all licensed law
enforcement officers, in accordance with rules promulgated under
section 11(2) of the Michigan commission on law enforcement
standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.611.

FIELD SERVICES
Sec. 601. (1) Department enlisted personnel who are employed
to enforce traffic laws as provided in section 629e of the Michigan
vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.629e, are not prohibited from
responding to crimes in progress or other emergency situations and
are responsible for making every effort to protect all residents of
this state.
(2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to continually work to enhance traffic safety throughout
this state and shall dedicate a minimum of 455,200 hours to
statewide patrol. The department shall work to improve public
safety efforts within distressed cities by enhancing data analysis
capabilities and identifying crime trends and areas with high
occurrence of crime.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


(3) The department shall report on the number of residence
checks of registered sex offenders conducted, as provided under
section 228.
Sec. 602. (1) The department shall identify and apprehend
criminals through criminal investigations in this state.
(2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to provide a comparable number of hours investigating
crimes as the average annual number provided during the preceding 5
fiscal years.
(3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to annually meet or exceed a case clearance rate of 62%.
(4) The department shall provide training opportunities to
local law enforcement partners with the goal of increasing their
knowledge of gambling laws, legal issues, opioid-related
investigations, and other emerging law enforcement issues.
(5) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to investigate the average annual number of opioid-
related investigations conducted by multijurisdictional task forces
and hometown security teams during the preceding 5 fiscal years.
The department shall work to enhance investigative and drug
interdiction efforts by enhancing data analysis capabilities and
linking investigations among multijurisdictional task forces and
hometown security teams.
Sec. 603. (1) The department shall provide protection to this
state, its economy, welfare, and vital state-sponsored programs
through the prevention and suppression of organized smuggling of
untaxed tobacco products in this state, through enforcement of the
tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, and
other laws pertaining to combating criminal activity in this state,
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


and by maintaining a tobacco tax enforcement unit.
(2) The department shall submit an annual report on December 1
to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on general government that details
expenditures and activities related to tobacco tax enforcement for
the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 604. The department shall provide fire investigation
training and investigative assistance to public safety agencies in
this state.
Sec. 605. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall make an organized, strategic effort to recruit
trooper school candidates and other new employees that mirror the
diverse racial, religious, and cultural backgrounds that make up
the communities in this state.

SPECIALIZED SERVICES
Sec. 701. (1) The department shall operate the Michigan
intelligence operations center for homeland security as this
state's primary federally designated fusion center to receive,
analyze, gather, and disseminate threat-related information among
federal, state, local, tribal, and private sector partners.
(2) The department shall ensure public safety by providing
public and private sector partners with timely and accurate
information regarding critical information key resource threats, as
reported to or discovered by the Michigan intelligence operations
center for homeland security, and shall increase public awareness
on how to report suspicious activity through website or telephone
communications.
(3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


necessary to support the cyber section, including the Michigan
cyber command center, the computer crimes unit, and the internet
crimes against children task force. The department shall maintain
the staffing and resources necessary to complete the average annual
number of cases completed by the computer crimes unit during the
preceding 5 fiscal years. The computer crimes unit shall pursue
process improvement initiatives to effectively utilize staff
resources in providing investigatory assistance and evidentiary
analysis for law enforcement and criminal justice agencies
statewide. The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to complete the average annual casework that the Michigan
cyber command center completed during the preceding 5 fiscal years.
(4) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to provide digital forensic analysis services with a goal
of decreasing backlogs of digital forensic analysis cases annually
until the department maintains a 60-day turnaround time.
Sec. 702. (1) The department shall provide specialized
services in support of, and to enhance, local, state, and federal
law enforcement operations within this state, in accordance with
all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.
(2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to provide training to maintain readiness to respond
appropriately to at least the average annual number of requests for
specialty services which occurred during the preceding 5 fiscal
years.
(3) The canine unit shall be available for call out statewide
100% of the time.
(4) The bomb squad unit shall be available for call out
statewide 100% of the time.
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


(5) The emergency support teams shall be available for call
out statewide 100% of the time.
(6) The marine services team shall be available for call out
statewide 100% of the time.
(7) Aviation services shall be available for call out
statewide 100% of the time, unless prohibited by weather or
unexpected mechanical breakdowns.
(8) The department shall maintain the staff and resources
necessary to provide security services at the State Capitol Complex
facilities, the State Secondary Complex, and other state-owned or
leased properties, as provided under section 6c of 1935 PA 59, MCL
28.6c. The department shall also maintain the staff and resources
necessary to respond to emergencies at the State Capitol Complex,
State Secondary Complex, House Office Building, Binsfeld Office
Building, Townsend Parking Ramp, Roosevelt Parking Ramp, and other
areas as directed. The department shall maintain a goal of annually
conducting 35,000 property inspections of state owned and leased
facilities.
Sec. 703. (1) The department shall maintain commercial vehicle
regulation, school bus inspections, and enforcement activities,
including enforcement of requirements concerning size, weight, and
load restrictions; operating authority; registration; fuel taxes;
transportation of hazardous materials; new entrant operations;
commercial driver licenses; and inspections pursuant to the federal
motor carrier assistance program.
(2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to meet inspection goals consistent with the department's
federal motor carrier assistance program activities.
(3) Revenue collected under the motor carrier act, 1933 PA
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, must be expended in accordance with that
act. Unexpended and unencumbered revenues must not lapse to the
general fund but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal
year.
Sec. 704. (1) The department shall coordinate the mitigation,
preparation, response, and recovery activities of municipal,
county, state, and federal governments, and other governmental
entities, for all hazards, disasters, and emergencies.
(2) The state director of emergency management may expend
money appropriated under part 1 to call on any agency or department
of this state or any resource of this state to protect life or
property or to provide for the health or safety of the population
in any area of this state in which the governor proclaims a state
of emergency or state of disaster under the emergency management
act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. The state director of
emergency management may expend the amounts the director considers
necessary to accomplish these purposes. The director shall submit
to the state budget director, as soon as possible, a complete
report of all actions taken under the authority of this section.
The report must contain, as a separate item, a statement of all
money expended that is not reimbursable from federal funding. The
state budget director shall review the expenditures and submit
recommendations to the legislature in regard to any possible need
for a supplemental appropriation.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may receive and expend money from local, private,
federal, or state sources for the purpose of providing emergency
management training to local or private interests and for the
purpose of supporting emergency preparedness, response, recovery,
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


and mitigation activity. If additional expenditure authorization in
SIGMA is approved by the state budget office under this section,
the department and the state budget office shall notify the senate
and house appropriations subcommittees on state police and the
senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval.
The notification must include the amount and source of the
additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the
projected use of the funds to be expended under the authorization.
The total amount of federal revenues that may be received and
expended under this section and section 232 must not exceed
$750,000,000.00.
(4) The department shall foster, promote, and maintain
partnerships to protect this state and homeland from all hazards.
(5) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources
necessary to do all of the following:
(a) Serve approximately 105 local emergency management
preparedness programs and 88 local emergency planning committees in
this state.
(b) Operate and maintain the state's emergency operations
center and provide command and control in support of emergency
response services.
(c) Maintain readiness, including training and equipment to
respond to civil disorders and natural disasters commensurate with
the capabilities of fiscal year 2010-2011.
(d) Perform hazardous materials response training.
(6) The department shall conduct a minimum of 3 training
sessions to enhance safe response in the event of natural or
manmade incidents, emergencies, or disasters.
(7) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


appropriated from the disaster and emergency contingency fund an
amount necessary to cover costs related to any disaster or
emergency as defined in the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390,
MCL 30.401 to 30.421. Funds must be expended as provided under
sections 18 and 19 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390,
MCL 30.418 and 30.419, and R 30.51 to R 30.61 of the Michigan
Administrative Code.
(8) If, in a particular month, expenditures are made from the
disaster and emergency contingency fund, the department shall
submit a report for that month to the senate and house fiscal
agencies detailing the purpose of the expenditures. The monthly
report required under this subsection must be submitted within 30
days after the end of the month during which funds from the
disaster and emergency contingency fund were expended.
(9) The department shall track and report on a biannual basis,
as provided in section 228 of this part, the status of the
department's assessment of critical infrastructure vulnerabilities,
including the protection status of critical infrastructure items
identified by the assessment. The department is not required to
report any information that could compromise the security of any
critical infrastructure.
(10) Revenue collected by the department under this section
for the emergency management and homeland security training center
that is unexpended and unencumbered at the end of the fiscal year
must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward
into the subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 705. The department shall provide for the planning,
administration, and implementation of highway traffic safety
programs to save lives and reduce injuries on roads in this state,
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


in partnership with other public and private organizations.
Sec. 706. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for the secondary
road patrol program must be used to provide grants to sheriffs
under the secondary road patrol program described under section 76
of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.76.
(2) The sheriffs' duties under the secondary road patrol
program, as outlined in section 76(2) of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.76, are
to do all of the following:
(a) Patrol and monitor traffic violations.
(b) Enforce the criminal laws of this state, violations of
which are observed by or brought to the attention of the sheriff's
department while patrolling and monitoring secondary roads.
(c) Investigate accidents involving motor vehicles.
(d) Provide emergency assistance to persons on or near a
highway or road the sheriff is patrolling and monitoring.
Sec. 707. The department shall serve as an active liaison
between the department of technology, management, and budget and
state, local, regional, and federal public safety agencies on
matters pertaining to the Michigan public safety communications
system and shall report user issues to the department of
technology, management, and budget.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801. (1) The general fund/general purpose funds
appropriated in part 1 for the disaster and emergency contingency
fund must be deposited into the disaster and emergency contingency
fund created in section 18 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA
390, MCL 30.418.
(2) Due to a significant increase in climate-related
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa


emergencies and disaster events, the existing $10,000,000.00
statutory cap and distribution guidelines in section 18 of the
emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.418, are not
sufficient. It is the intent of the legislature to complete passage
of Senate Bill No. 109 of 2025 and increase funding to meet the
needs of residents and communities impacted by emergencies or
disaster events.
Final Page
STM S06116'26 (S-1) b0u6xa